Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2603, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 485, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2603), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2603. A. Except as otherwise provided for in


subsection B of this section and elsewhere in this section, to be


eligible to participate in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access

Req. No. 2388 Page 1


Program and to qualify for an award which includes payment of an


amount equivalent to resident tuition or other tuition pursuant to


Section 2604 of this title for the first semester or other academic


unit of postsecondary enrollment, a student shall:


1. Be a resident of this state or be enrolled in a school


district located in this state that serves students who reside in


both this state and an adjacent state pursuant to a contract as


authorized in Section 5-117.1 of this title;


2. Be a United States citizen or lawfully present in the United


States. A student who is not a United States citizen or lawfully


present in the United States shall not be eligible to participate in


the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program and to qualify for an


award notwithstanding the provisions of Section 3242 of this title.


The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any student who


was enrolled in the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program prior to


the end of the 2006-2007 school year;


3. Have a record of satisfactory compliance with agreements


executed pursuant to Section 2605 of this title;


4. a. Have graduated within the previous three (3) years


from a high school accredited by the State Board of


Education or the Oklahoma School of Science and


Mathematics with a minimum 2.5 cumulative grade point


average on a 4.0 scale for all work attempted in


grades nine through twelve,

Req. No. 2388 Page 2


b. Have graduated within the previous three (3) years


from a high school not accredited by the State Board


of Education with a minimum 2.5 cumulative grade point


average on a 4.0 scale for all work attempted in


grades nine through twelve and have achieved a


composite score of 22 or higher on the ACT test or an


equivalent score on the Scholastic Assessment Test


(SAT) or Classic Learning Test (CLT) as determined by


the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, or


c. Have satisfactorily completed within the previous


three (3) years an educational program that was


provided through a means other than a public or


private school and have achieved a composite score of


or higher on the ACT test or an equivalent score on


the SAT or CLT as determined by the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education;


5. Have completed the curricular requirements for admission to


an institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education


or have completed the core curriculum and be seeking admission to a


technology center school overseen by the State Board of Career and


Technology Education. Students shall also have attained a 2.5 grade


point average in the core curriculum courses. Students who attended


a high school which did not offer all the core curriculum courses or


students who were educated by other means and were not offered all

Req. No. 2388 Page 3


the core curriculum courses shall be allowed to satisfy this


curriculum requirement by participating in a program approved by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for remediation of high


school curricular deficiencies;


6. Have satisfied admission standards as determined by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for first-time-entering


students for the appropriate type of institution, or, if attending a


private institution, have satisfied admission standards as


determined by the private institution. No student participating in


the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program shall be admitted into


an institution of higher education by special admission standards;


7. Have secured admission to, and enrolled in, an institution


which is a member of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,


a postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by a technology


center school that meets the requirements to be eligible for federal


student financial aid, or a private institution of higher learning


located within this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of


this title; and


8. a. Have established financial need according to the


provisions of subsection D of Section 2605 of this


title and standards and provisions promulgated by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education,


b. If the student was adopted between birth and twelve


(12) years of age while in the permanent custody of

Req. No. 2388 Page 4


the Department of Human Services, in the court-ordered


custody of a licensed private nonprofit child-placing


agency, or federally recognized Indian tribe, as


defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of


1978, have established financial need according to the


provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection E of Section


2605 of this title and standards and provisions


promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education,


c. If the student was adopted between thirteen (13) and


seventeen (17) years of age while in the permanent


custody of the Department of Human Services, in the


court-ordered custody of a licensed private nonprofit


child-placing agency, or federally recognized Indian


tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare


Act of 1978, have established financial need according


to the provisions of paragraph 2 of subsection E of


Section 2605 of this title and standards and


provisions promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education,


d. If the student was placed in the custody of the


Department of Human Services at any time during the


eighth, ninth, tenth, or eleventh grade and enrolls in


the program no later than his or her official date of

Req. No. 2388 Page 5


high school graduation, have established financial


need according to the provisions of paragraph 3 of


subsection E of Section 2605 of this title and


standards and provisions promulgated by the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education, or


e. If the student is the child of a certified classroom


teacher or certified personnel and meets the


provisions of paragraph 5 of subsection E of Section


2605 of this title. For the purposes of this


paragraph, “certified classroom teacher” and


“certified personnel” shall have the same meaning


meanings as provided in subparagraph d of paragraph 5


of subsection E of Section 2605 of this title.


B. 1. A student shall be eligible to participate in the


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program and to qualify for an award


which includes payment of an amount equivalent to resident tuition


or other tuition pursuant to Section 2604 of this title for the


first semester or other academic unit of postsecondary enrollment if


the student meets all of the following criteria:


a. is a child of any person killed after January 1, 2000,


in the line of duty in any branch of the United States


Armed Forces or who died after January 1, 2000, as a


result of an injury sustained while in the line of


duty in any branch of the United States Armed Forces

Req. No. 2388 Page 6


and the person who was killed or died filed an


individual or joint Oklahoma income tax return for the


tax year prior to the year during which the person was


killed or died,


b. is a resident of this state or is enrolled in a school


district located in this state that serves students


who reside in both this state and an adjacent state


pursuant to a contract as authorized in Section 5-


117.1 of this title,


c. enrolls in an institution within The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education prior to reaching the age


of twenty-one (21),


d. has satisfied admission standards as determined by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for first-


time-entering students for the appropriate type of


institution, or, if attending a private institution,


has satisfied admission standards as determined by the


private institution. No student participating in the


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program shall be


admitted into an institution of higher education by


special admission standards,


e. has secured admission to, and enrolled in, an


institution which is a member of The Oklahoma State


System of Higher Education, a postsecondary

Req. No. 2388 Page 7


vocational-technical program offered by a technology


center school that meets the requirements to be


eligible for federal student financial aid, or a


private institution of higher learning located within


this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of


this title, and


f. executes an agreement pursuant to subsection C of


Section 2605 of this title.


2. A student who is eligible to participate in the program


pursuant to this subsection shall not be required to meet the


eligibility requirements set forth in subsection A of this section.


C. To retain eligibility while pursuing the program of higher


learning in which enrolled, the student shall:


1. Meet the requirements for retention and degree completion as


established by the institution in which the student is enrolled;


2. Maintain good academic standing and satisfactory academic


progress according to standards of the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education;


3. Maintain satisfactory academic progress as required for


eligibility for federal Title IV of the Higher Education Act of


1965, 20 U.S.C., Section 1070 et seq., student financial aid


programs. The provisions of this paragraph shall become effective


for the 2012-2013 school year;



Req. No. 2388 Page 8


4. Comply with the standards related to maintenance of


eligibility as promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education; and


5. Refrain from conduct that leads to expulsion or suspension


of more than one semester from an institution of higher education.


A student who violates the provisions of this paragraph shall


permanently lose eligibility for program benefits. The provisions


of this paragraph shall become effective January 1, 2008.


D. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the


State Board of Career and Technology Education shall promulgate


rules relating to maintenance of eligibility under the Oklahoma


Higher Learning Access Act by a student.


E. It is the intent of the Legislature that students in the


ninth grade for the 1992-93 1992-1993 school year who are determined


to be eligible Oklahoma Higher Learning Access students pursuant to


the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Act shall be the first students


eligible for benefits from the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Trust


Fund.


F. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education are


authorized to study, develop, and propose criteria for determining


award eligibility based upon the completion of seven semesters of


high school coursework by a student.





Req. No. 2388 Page 9


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2605, as


last amended by Section 2, Chapter 485, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 2605), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2605. A. Each school year, every fifth- through


eleventh-grade student in the public and private schools of this


state and students who are educated by other means and are in the


equivalent of the fifth through eleventh grade shall be apprised,


together with the parent, custodial parent, or guardian of the


student, of the opportunity for access to higher learning under the


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program. The Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education and the State Board of Education shall develop,


promote, and coordinate a public awareness program to be utilized in


making students and parents aware of the Oklahoma Higher Learning


Access Program.


B. On a form provided by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education, every public school district shall designate at least one


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program contact person, who shall be


a counselor or teacher, at each public school site in this state in


which eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade classes are taught.


When requested by the State Regents, the State Board of Education


shall assist the State Regents to ensure the designation of contact


persons. Private schools shall also designate at least one school


official as a contact person. For students who are educated by



Req. No. 2388 Page 10


other means, a parent or guardian or other person approved by the


State Regents shall be designated the contact person.


C. 1. Students who qualify on the basis of financial need


according to subsection D or E of this section or who meet the


eligibility qualification set forth in subparagraph a of paragraph 1


of subsection B of Section 2603 of this title no later than December


of their twelfth-grade year or prior to reaching the age of


seventeen (17) and who qualify on the basis of the standards and


provisions promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education shall be given the opportunity throughout the eighth-,


ninth-, tenth-, and eleventh-grade years and no later than December


of the twelfth-grade year, for students enrolled in a public or


private school, or between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen


(17), for students who are educated by other means, to enter into


participation in the program by agreeing to, throughout the


remainder of their school years or educational program:


a. attend school or an educational program regularly and


do homework regularly,


b. refrain from substance abuse,


c. refrain from commission of crimes or delinquent acts,


d. have school work and school records reviewed by


mentors designated pursuant to the program,





Req. No. 2388 Page 11


e. provide information requested by the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education or the State Board of


Education, and


f. participate in program activities.


2. Students who meet the eligibility qualification set forth in


subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 2603 of


this title after December 31 of their twelfth-grade year or after


reaching the age of eighteen (18) shall be given the opportunity


prior to reaching the age of twenty-one (21) to enter into


participation in the program and shall execute an agreement with


provisions as determined by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education.


3. The contact person shall maintain the agreements, which


shall be executed on forms provided by the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education and managed according to regulations


promulgated by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, and


the contact person shall monitor compliance of the student with the


terms of the agreement. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education are authorized to process student agreements and verify


compliance with the agreements. Students failing to comply with the


terms of the agreement shall not be eligible for the awards provided


in Section 2604 of this title.





Req. No. 2388 Page 12


4. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may provide


an exception to the age limits provided for in paragraphs 1 and 2 of


this subsection pursuant to subsection L of this section.


5. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 5-132 and 5-132.1


of this title, a student who is age twenty-one (21) or older shall


not be eligible to enter into participation in the program.


D. Except as otherwise provided for in subsection E of this


section and except for students who qualify pursuant to subsection B


of Section 2603 of this title, a student shall not be found to be in


financial need for purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program if:


1. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, or tenth-grade students who


are enrolled in a public or private school or students between the


ages of thirteen (13) and fifteen (15) who are educated by other


means who apply for participation in the program in the 2017-2018


school year, the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s) exceeds Fifty-five Thousand Dollars ($55,000.00) per year;


2. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students who are enrolled in a public or private school or students


between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) who are educated


by other means who apply for participation in the program in the


2021-2022 school year, the federal adjusted gross income of the


student’s parent(s) exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per


year;

Req. No. 2388 Page 13


3. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students who are enrolled in a public or private school or students


between the ages of thirteen (13) and sixteen (16) who are educated


by other means who apply for participation in the program in the


2022-2023 school year:


a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,


exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year,


b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,


exceeds Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per


year, or


c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,


exceeds Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year;


4. Beginning with eighth-, ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade


students or twelfth-grade students no later than December 31 of


their twelfth-grade year who are enrolled in a public or private


school or students between the ages of thirteen (13) and seventeen


(17) who are educated by other means who apply for participation in


the program in the 2025-2026 school year:


a. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have two or fewer dependent children,


exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year,

Req. No. 2388 Page 14


b. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have three or four dependent children,


exceeds Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) per


year, or


c. the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s), who have five or more dependent children,


exceeds Eighty Thousand Dollars ($80,000.00) per year;


5. Beginning with the 2018-2019 academic year, prior to


receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award


for any year during which the student is enrolled in an institution


which is a member of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,


a postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by a technology


center school that meets the requirements to be eligible for federal


student financial aid, or a private institution of higher learning


located within this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of


this title, the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s


parent(s) exceeds One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) per


year.


The determination of financial qualification as set forth in


this paragraph shall be based on the income of the student, not the


income of the parent(s), if a student:


a. is determined to be independent of the student’s


parents for federal financial aid purposes,



Req. No. 2388 Page 15


b. was in the permanent custody of the Department of


Human Services at the time the student enrolled in the


program, or


c. was in the court-ordered custody of a federally


recognized Indian tribe, as defined by the federal


Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, at the time the


student enrolled in the program.


The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to any student who


has received an Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit


award after the 2017-2018 school year; and


6. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall review


the determination of financial qualification as set forth in


paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4 of this subsection if the income from


taxable and nontaxable sources of the student’s parent(s) includes


income received from nontaxable military benefits or income received


from the federal Social Security Administration due to the death or


disability of the student’s parent(s). If the income from taxable


and nontaxable sources of the student’s parent(s), excluding income


received from nontaxable military benefits or income received from


the federal Social Security Administration due to the death or


disability of the student’s parent(s), does not exceed the


limitations set forth by paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4 of this


subsection, the student shall be determined to have met the



Req. No. 2388 Page 16


financial qualification set forth in paragraphs 1, 2, 3, and 4 of


this subsection.


E. 1. A student who was adopted between birth and twelve (12)


years of age while in the permanent custody of the Department of


Human Services, in the court-ordered custody of a licensed private


nonprofit child-placing agency, or federally recognized Indian


tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978,


shall not be found to be in financial need for purposes of the


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program if at the time the student


begins postsecondary education and prior to receiving any Oklahoma


Higher Learning Access Program benefit award, the federal adjusted


gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds One Hundred Fifty


Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) per year. The provisions of this


paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the


2012-2013 school year.


2. A student who was adopted between thirteen (13) and


seventeen (17) years of age while in the permanent custody of the


Department of Human Services, in the court-ordered custody of a


licensed private nonprofit child-placing agency, or federally


recognized Indian tribe, as defined by the federal Indian Child


Welfare Act of 1978, shall not be found to be in financial need for


purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program if at the


time the student begins postsecondary education and prior to

Req. No. 2388 Page 17


receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award,


the federal adjusted gross income of the student’s parent(s) exceeds


Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) per year. The provisions


of this paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the


2012-2013 school year.


3. A student who was placed in the custody of the Department of


Human Services at any time during the eighth, ninth, tenth, or


eleventh grade and enrolls in the program no later than his or her


official date of high school graduation shall not be found to be in


financial need for purposes of the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program if the federal adjusted gross income of the student exceeds


Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) per year.


4. Except for students who qualify pursuant to subsection B of


Section 2603 of this title, the determination of financial


qualification as set forth in this subsection shall be based on the


income of the student, not the income of the parent(s), if the


student is determined to be independent of the student’s parent(s)


for federal financial aid purposes. A determination of financial


qualification shall not be required for the student who meets the


criteria set forth in this subsection at the time the student


applies for participation in the program. The provisions of this


paragraph shall not apply to any student who has received an



Req. No. 2388 Page 18


Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program benefit award prior to the


2008-2009 school year.


5. a. A student who is the child of a certified classroom


teacher or certified personnel at the time the student


applies for participation in the Oklahoma Higher


Learning Access Program shall not be found to be in


financial need for the purposes of the Oklahoma Higher


Learning Access Program if, beginning with eighth-,


ninth-, tenth-, or eleventh-grade students or twelfth-


grade students no later than December 31 of their


twelfth-grade year who are enrolled in a public or


private school or students between thirteen (13) and


seventeen (17) years of age who are educated by other


means who apply for participation in the program in


the 2025-2026 school year if the students are children


of a certified classroom teacher or who apply for


participation in the program in the 2026-2027 school


year if the students are children of certified


personnel, the household income of the student’s


parent(s) is equal to or greater than seven hundred


percent (700%) of the federal poverty level (FPL).


b. Prior to receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program benefit award for any year during which the


student is enrolled in an institution that is a member

Req. No. 2388 Page 19


of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, a


postsecondary vocational-technical program offered by


a technology center school that meets the eligibility


requirements for federal student financial aid, or a


private institution of higher learning located within


this state and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of


this title, the household income of the parent(s) of a


student who qualifies pursuant to this paragraph shall


not be equal to or greater than seven hundred percent


(700%) of the federal poverty level (FPL).


c. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


verify the full-time employment status of the


student’s parent(s) prior to a student who qualifies


pursuant to this paragraph receiving any Oklahoma


Higher Learning Access Program benefit award.


d. For the purposes of this paragraph,:


(1) “certified classroom teacher” means a certified,


full-time classroom teacher who has been employed


as a teacher in a public school district


classroom in this state for a minimum of ten (10)


years prior to his or her child applying for


participation in the program. The teacher is not


required to have been employed by the same public


school district for ten (10) consecutive years.

Req. No. 2388 Page 20


Certified classroom teacher does not mean a


certified teacher who is employed as a school


district superintendent, principal, or any other


position within the administration of a public


school district when his or her child applies for


participation in the program or prior to his or


her child receiving any Oklahoma Higher Learning


Access Program benefit award, and


(2) “certified personnel” means a certified, full-


time principal, supervisor, administrator,


counselor, librarian, or certified or registered


nurse who has been employed as a certified


classroom teacher, principal, supervisor,


administrator, counselor, librarian, or certified


or registered nurse for a minimum of ten (10)


years prior to his or her child applying for


participation in the program. The member of


certified personnel is not required to have been


employed by the same public school district for


ten (10) consecutive years. Certified personnel


shall not mean a superintendent.


F. The financial qualification of a student as set forth in


subsections D and E of this section shall be certified by the


contact person or by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education

Req. No. 2388 Page 21


on the agreement form provided by the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education. The form shall be retained in the permanent


record of the student and a copy forwarded to the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education.


G. Agreements shall be witnessed by the parent, custodial


parent, or guardian of the student, who shall further agree to:


1. Assist the student in achieving compliance with the


agreements;


2. Confer, when requested to do so, with the school contact


person, other school personnel, and program mentors;


3. Provide information requested by the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education or the State Board of Education; and


4. Assist the student in completing forms and reports required


for program participation, making applications to institutions and


schools of higher learning, and filing applications for student


grants and scholarships.


H. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


promulgate rules for the determination of student compliance with


agreements made pursuant to this section.


I. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


designate personnel to coordinate tracking of program records for


the years when students participating in the program are still in


the schools or are being educated by other means, provide staff


development for contact persons in the schools, and provide liaison

Req. No. 2388 Page 22


with the State Board of Education and local organizations and


individuals participating in the program.


J. The school district where an Oklahoma Higher Learning Access


Program student is enrolled when the student begins participation in


the program and any subsequent school district where the student


enrolls shall forward information regarding participation by the


student in the program to a school to which the student transfers


upon the request of the school for the records of the student.


K. Students participating in the Oklahoma Higher Learning


Access Program shall provide their Social Security number or their


student identification number used by their school to the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education. The State Regents shall keep


the numbers confidential and use them only for administrative


purposes.


L. The State Regents may provide an exception to the age limits


provided for in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection C of this section


to a student due to hardship circumstances and allow an application


to the Oklahoma Higher Learning Access Program for twelfth-grade


students enrolled in a public or private school and students who are


educated by other means and are in the equivalent of twelfth grade.


Provided, however, the exception due to hardship circumstances shall


not apply to:


1. A student enrolled in a public or private school after the


student’s official date of high school graduation;

Req. No. 2388 Page 23


2. A student educated by other means who is age nineteen (19)


or older; or


3. Any student who is age twenty-one (21) or older.


The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall promulgate


rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 3. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2603, as last


amended by Section 7, Chapter 277, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2603), is hereby repealed.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2388 EB 1/15/2026 8:35:38 AM



















Req. No. 2388 Page 24